Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3110
Competitive bidding; considerations.

In awarding the bid, the following elements shall be given consideration when applicable:

(1) The price;

(2) The ability, capacity, and skill of the supplier to perform;

(3) The character, integrity, reputation, judgment, experience, and efficiency of the supplier;

(4) The quality of previous performance;

(5) Whether the supplier can perform within the time specified;

(6) The previous and existing compliance of the supplier with laws relating to the purchase or contract;

(7) The life-cost of the personal property or service in relation to the purchase price and the specific use;

(8) The performance of the personal property or service taking into consideration any commonly accepted tests and standards of product or service usability and user requirements;

(9) The energy efficiency ratio as stated by the supplier;

(10) The life-cycle costs between alternatives for all classes of equipment, the evidence of expected life, the repair and maintenance costs, and the energy consumption on a per year basis; and

(11) Such other information as may be secured having a bearing on the decision.

Laws 1985, LB 393, § 10.